dict-hi_IN/hi_IN.aff
FLAG	num
#PREFIXES
PFX	201	Y	4
PFX	201	अ	मुख्या	अ
PFX	201	अ	प्रधाना	अ
PFX	201	अ	महा	अ
PFX	201	अ	उपा	अ

#
PFX	202	Y	4
PFX	202	0	मुख्य	.
PFX	202	0	प्रधान	.
PFX	202	0	महा	.
PFX	202	0	उप	.

#
PFX	203	Y	4
PFX	203	आ	मुख्या	आ
PFX	203	आ	प्रधाना	आ
PFX	203	आ	महा	आ
PFX	203	आ	उपा	आ

PFX	204	Y	2
PFX	204	0	खुश	.
PFX	204	0	बद	.

PFX	205	Y	4
PFX	205	0	सु	.
PFX	205	0	कु	.
PFX	205	0	सद्	.
PFX	205	0	स्व	.

PFX	206	Y	1
PFX	206	0	बे	.

PFX	207	Y	1
PFX	207	0	बा	.

PFX	208	Y	1
PFX	208	0	हर	.

PFX	209	Y	1
PFX	209	0	हम	.

PFX	210	Y	1
PFX	210	0	ना	.

PFX	211	Y	1
PFX	211	0	दर	.

PFX	212	Y	1
PFX	212	0	ऐन	.

PFX	213	Y	1
PFX	213	0	वि	.

PFX	214	Y	2
PFX	214	0	एक	.
PFX	214	0	बहु	.
