dict-hi_IN/hi_IN.dic
अक्ल/206
अदब/207
अध्यक्ष/201
अवसर/205
असर/206
असल/211
आचार्य/203
इज्जत/206
इज्जत/207
इज़्ज़त/207
इंतजामी/204
इंसाफ/210
इंसाफ़/210
ईमान/206
उम्मीद/210
उम्र/209
उसूल/206
एक/208
क/214
कट/213
कद्र/210
कन्या/205
कर/205
करार/206
कर्म/205
कर्मी/205
कल/213
कवि/205
कसूर/206
काफ़ी/210
काबिल/210
काम/206
काम/210
कामयाब/210
कायदा/207
कार/206
कार/211
कारा/210
काल/205
कालिक/214
कास/213
किनार/211
किस/210
किस्मत/204
किस्मती/204
की/210
कीर्ति/205
कुल/205
कुल/210
कुंडल/36,214
कृत/205
कृत/213
कृति/205
कृती/205
कोई/208
कोशीय/214
कंठ/205
खटक/206
ख़त/204
ख़बर/206
खबरी/204
ख़बरी/204
खास्त/211
ख़ुदा/210
खुश/210
खौफ़/206
ख्यात/205
ख्यात/213
ख्याति/205
ख़्वाह/204
गठित/205
गढ़/205
गत/205
गति/205
गन्ध/205
गम/205
गमता/205
गम्य/205
गरज़/206
गवार/204
गवार/210
गव्य/36,214
गाछी/214
गिज़/208
ग़ुजर/211
गुमान/204
गोई/204
गंध/205
घड़ी/208
घर/206
घात/205
चक्र/205
चक्र/214
चक्र/36,214
चक्रा/32,214
चर/214
चर/36,214
चरित्र/205
चर्चित/205
चलन/204
चलनी/204
चश्म/214
चश्म/36,214
चार/213
चारा/206
चारिणी/214
चारी/214
चारु/205
चालक/205
चाली/205
चित्त/214
चीज/208
चीज/210
चूक/206
चेष्टा/205
चैन/206
चोबा/32,214
छत्र/214
जगह/212
ज़बान/204
जय/213
ज़ात/204
जात/214
जातीय/214
जान/214
ज़ाब्ता/207
ज़ायका/204
जीव/214
जीव/36,214
जुटता/214
जोली/209
ज्ञान/213
झिझक/206
टक/36,214
ठा/32,214
ड़/36,214
तकल्लुफ़/206
तमीज़/204
तर/204
तरफ/208
तरफ़ा/214
तरह/206
तर्क/205
तल्ला/214
ता/214
तान/214
तारा/32,214
तंत्र/214
तंत्र/36,214
त्र/36,214
त्रित/214
त्रीकरण/36,214
त्रीभूत/214
त्व/36,214
त्ववाद/36,214
दन्त/36,214
दम/208
दम/209
दम/36,214
दरा/214
दर्द/206
दर्द/209
दर्दी/209
दलीय/214
दस्ती/214
दाग/206
दाम/206
दिन/205
दिन/208
दिमाग/204
दिल/214
दिली/214
दिश/214
दूर/205
दृक/214
दृक/36,214
दृढ़/205
दृष्टि/205
दृष्टि/214
देश/213
देशी/213
देशीय/214
देशीय/36,214
देह/36,214
दंडिन/36,214
दंडी/214
दंत/36,214
दंता/214
धड़क/206
धर्मा/214
धर्मी/214
नज़र/204
नयन/214
नयन/36,214
नवीस/204
नसीब/204
नागा/206
नाम/204,205
नामी/204
नार/205
नाश/213
निष्ठ/214
निष्ठ/36,214
नीता/205
नीति/205
नीयती/204
नुमा/204
नेत्र/214
नेत्र/36,214
नैना/205
न्यायाधीश/202
पक्ष/213
पक्षी/214
पक्षीय/214
पथ/205
पथगामी/205
पथ्य/205
पद/214
पद/36,214
पदी/214
परवाह/206
परहेज़/204
परीत/213
पर्णा/32,214
पसंद/210
पाक/210
पाटला/32,214
पाठ/205
पात्र/205
पाद/214
पाद/36,214
पारी/205
पार्श्विक/214
पुत्र/205
पुत्री/205
पुष्पी/214
पेशा/209
पोश/204
पोषण/205
पोषित/205
प्रथा/205
प्रबंध/205
प्रभाव/205
प्रस्थान/205
प्राण/214
फल/205
फ़सला/214
फ़ायदा/206
ब/211
बख़्त/204
बह/205
बात/208
बार/208
बार/211
बालिग/210
बुद्धि/205
बू/204
बूदार/204
बोध/205
भाग/213
भाव/206
भाष/205
भाषा/205
भुक्त/214
भुक्त/36,214
मकसद/206
मज़ा/204
मत/214
मत/36,214
मतलब/206
मति/205
मन/205
मन/206
मन्त्री/202
मल/213
मस्त/204
मस्ती/204
मात्र/214
मात्र/36,214
मात्रिक/214
मान/213
मार्ग/205
मार्गी/205
माश/204
माशी/204
मिज़ाज/204
मियान/211
मिसाल/206
मुख/205
मुखी/214
मुमकिन/210
मुलायजा/207
मुश्त/36,214
मेक/214
मौका/207
मौका/212
मौके/206
मौके/212
मंज़िला/214
मंत्र/205
मंत्रणा/205
मंत्री/202
यश/205
योग/205
योग/213
रक्षा/205
रस/214
रसता/214
रहम/206
राज/209
राज/210
राम/213
राय/214
रास्ता/207
राह/209
राही/209
रूप/205
रूप/214
रूप/36,214
रूपता/214
रेखा/205
रेखीय/214
रोकटोक/206
रोज/208
रोजगार/206
रोध/213
रंग/204
रंग/214
ल/214
लक्षणा/205
लभ/205
लव्य/36,214
लाई/214
लायक/210
लिंग/214
लिंग/36,214
लिंगी/214
लेख/205
लोम/213
वक्त/206
वक्त/208
वक्त/212
वचन/36,214
वजह/206
वतन/209
वफा/206
वर्ण/214
वर्षी/214
वाक्यता/214
वाद/213
वाह/213
विचार/205
वृत्त/213
वेणी/214
शक/206
शक्ल/204
शक्ल/209
शगुनी/204
शासन/36,214
शील/205
शुमार/206
शेष/213
शेष/36,214
शेषण/213
शेषता/213
श्रुत/214
श्रुतधर/214
श्रुति/214
सचिव/202
सत्ताक/214
सत्तावाद/36,214
सदनात्मक/214
सफर/209
सबब/206
समझ/206
समझ/210
सर/214
सलूकी/204
सहारा/206
सा/32,214
साख्ता/206
सार/214
साल/208
साला/214
साँ/214
सुरा/214
सूत्र/214
सूत्रता/214
सूत्री/214
सूरत/204
स्व/36,214
हक/210
हकीकत/211
हज़मी/204
हत्था/214
हत्थी/214
हवास/204
हवासी/204
हार/213
हाल/204,206,208
हाली/204
हिसाब/206
होश/206
